Rhode Island, session 2025, SB911.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other general or special law to the contrary, Nunzio
Pontillo may join Andrew Peter Carson and Christos Nelson Anastasopoulos in marriage within
the City of Newport, Rhode Island, on or about May 10, 2025. Nunzio Pontillo is hereby authorized
and empowered to join the foregoing persons in marriage pursuant to and in accordance with
Chapter 3 of Title 15 of the General Laws, entitled “Solemnization of Marriages.”
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002597
========